Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201381-826
Wildfire Control Act of 2013; legislative
findings.

The
Legislature finds that the State of Nebraska's forests, pasture lands, and
rangelands have been destroyed by catastrophic wildfires, primarily due to
higher temperatures, intense and prolonged drought, increased forest fuel-loads,
and the extensive spread of Eastern Red Cedar trees into forests, pasture
lands, and rangelands. Because of these conditions, wildfires occur more frequently,
spread and grow very rapidly upon ignition, and consume large tracts of productive
land. These severe, fast-moving wildfires put the lives of citizens, emergency
responders, and visitors at great risk, are difficult to control, quickly
overwhelm local suppression capacity, and cost enormous amounts of money to
suppress and control.

Laws 2013, LB634, § 2.
June 4, 2013